Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

44-30-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 30 is the "Limited Gaming Act of 1991".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 168, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-101 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares it to be the public policy of this state that:

The success of limited gaming is dependent upon public confidence and trust that licensed limited gaming is conducted honestly and competitively; that the rights of the creditors of licensees are protected; and that gaming is free from criminal and corruptive elements;

Public confidence and trust can be maintained only by strict regulation of all persons, locations, practices, associations, and activities related to the operation of licensed gaming establishments and the manufacture or distribution of gaming devices and equipment;

All establishments where limited gaming is conducted and where gambling devices are operated and all manufacturers, sellers, and distributors of certain gambling devices and equipment must therefore be licensed, controlled, and assisted to protect the public health, safety, good order, and the general welfare of the inhabitants of the state to foster the stability and success of limited gaming and to preserve the economy and policies of free competition of the state of Colorado;

No applicant for a license or other affirmative commission approval has any right to a license or to the granting of the approval sought. Any license issued or other commission approval granted pursuant to the provisions of this article 30 is a revocable privilege, and no holder acquires any vested right therein or thereunder.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, to achieve the goals set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the commission should place great weight upon the policies expressed in said subsection (1) in construing the provisions of this article 30.

The general assembly further finds, determines, and declares that:

When, in 2018, the United States supreme court held in Murphy v. National Collegiate Athletic Association, 138 S. Ct. 1461, that there existed no current federal impediment to an individual state's authority to legalize sports betting, but that such an effort was subject only to that state's own constitutional limits on that authority, Colorado had the option to expand the responsibilities of the limited gaming control commission created in this article 30 to include sports betting;

Expansion of the commission's role in this way is appropriate, given the commission's experience in regulating limited gaming since 1991 and its track record of competent, evenhanded, and efficient discharge of the duties entrusted to it by Colorado's voters under section 9 of article XVIII of the state constitution;

The general assembly intends, through passage of House Bill 19-1327, enacted in 2019, to incorporate sports betting seamlessly into the regulatory and taxing system established for limited gaming under this article 30 in a manner that honors the voters' intent in adopting section 9 of article XVIII of the state constitution and has done so through enactment of a referred measure requiring statewide approval;

It is appropriate, and the general assembly intends, that after the incorporation of sports betting into this article 30 on May 1, 2020, no further expansion of sports betting nor authorization of any new or expanded class of licensees be made except with the approval of Colorado voters through legislation or constitutional amendments that are submitted to a statewide vote; and

The success of sports betting is dependent upon public confidence and trust that activities related to sports betting are conducted honestly and competitively; that the rights of the creditors of licensees are protected; and that sports betting is free from criminal and corruptive elements. Public confidence and trust can be maintained only by strict regulation of sports betting.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 169, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3209, § 1, effective May 1, 2020.

44-30-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 30, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adjusted gross proceeds", except with respect to games of poker, means the total amount of all wagers made by players on limited gaming less all payments to players; and payment to players shall include all payments of cash premiums, merchandise, tokens, redeemable game credits, or any other thing of value. With respect to games of poker, "adjusted gross proceeds" means any sums wagered in a poker hand that may be retained by the licensee as compensation and are consistent with the minimum and maximum amounts established by the Colorado limited gaming control commission.

"Applicant" means any person who has applied for a license or registration under this article 30 or who has applied for permission to engage in any act or activity that is regulated by this article 30.

"Associated equipment" means a device, piece of equipment, or system used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or any game. The term includes a device, piece of equipment, or system used to monitor, collect, or report gaming transactions data or to calculate adjusted gross proceeds and gaming taxes.

"Associated equipment" does not include equipment that meets the definition of a "gaming device" or "gaming equipment" in subsection (13) of this section.

"Associated equipment supplier" means a person who imports, manufactures, distributes, or otherwise provides associated equipment for use in Colorado. The term does not include a person licensed as a slot machine manufacturer or distributor under part 5 of this article 30.

"Bet" means an amount placed as a wager in a game of chance or on a sports event, as defined in section 44-30-1501 (12).

"Blackjack" means a banking card game commonly known as "21" or "blackjack" in which each player bets against the dealer. The object is to draw cards whose value will equal or approach twenty-one without exceeding that amount and win amounts bet, payable by the dealer, if the player holds cards more valuable than the dealer's cards.

"Certified local government" means any local government certified by the state historic preservation officer pursuant to the provisions of 54 U.S.C. sec. 302503.

"Commission" means the Colorado limited gaming control commission.

"Crane game" means an amusement machine that, upon insertion of a coin, bill, token, or similar object, allows the player to use one or more buttons, joysticks, or other controls to maneuver a crane or claw over a nonmonetary prize, toy, or novelty, none of which shall have a cost of more than twenty-five dollars, and then, using the crane or claw, to attempt to retrieve the prize, toy, or novelty for the player.

"Craps" means a game played by one or more players against a casino using two dice, in which players bet upon the occurrence of specific combinations of numbers shown by the dice on each throw.

"Director" means the director of the division of gaming.

"Division" means the division of gaming.

"Gaming device" or "gaming equipment" means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic contrivance, component, or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or any game. The term includes a system for processing information that can alter the normal criteria of random selection affecting the operation, or determining the outcome, of a game. The term includes a physical or electronic version of a slot machine, poker table, blackjack table, craps table, roulette table, dice, and the cards used to play poker and blackjack.

"Gaming employee" means any person employed by an operator or retailer hosting gaming to work directly with the gaming portion of the operator's or retailer's business, who shall be eighteen years of age or older and hold a support license. Persons deemed to be gaming employees include:

Dealers;

Change and counting room personnel;

Cashiers;

Floormen;

Cage personnel;

Slot machine repairmen or mechanics;

Persons who accept or transport gaming revenues;

Security personnel;

Shift or pit bosses;

Floor managers;

Supervisors;

Slot machine and slot booth personnel;

Any person involved in the handling, counting, collecting, or exchanging of money, property, checks, credit, or any representative of value, including, without limitation:

Any coin, token, chip, cash premium, merchandise, redeemable game credits, or any other thing of value; or

The payoff from any game, gaming, or gaming device;

Craps table personnel and roulette table personnel; and

Any other persons that the commission shall by rule determine.

"Gaming license" means any license issued by the commission pursuant to this article 30 that authorizes any person to engage in gaming within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek.

"Immediate family" means a person's spouse and any children actually living with the person.

"Key employee" means any executive, employee, or agent of a gaming licensee or sports betting licensee having the power to exercise a significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the operation of the gaming licensee or sports betting licensee.

"Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed pursuant to this article 30 for the conduct of gaming.

"Licensed premises" means that portion of any premises licensed for the conduct of limited gaming. Nothing pursuant to this subsection (19) shall be construed to prohibit the affected local governing authority from otherwise determining the size of any building. In no event shall the licensed premises exceed thirty-five percent of the square footage of any building and no more than fifty percent of any one floor of the building.

"Licensee" means any person licensed under this article 30.

"Licensing authority" means the Colorado limited gaming control commission.

"Limited card games and slot machines", "limited gaming", or "gaming" means physical and electronic versions of slot machines, craps, roulette, and the card games of poker and blackjack authorized by this article 30, as well as such other games as are approved by the voters of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek at a local election held in each city to control the conduct of gaming in that jurisdiction, and defined and regulated by the commission, each game having a maximum single bet as approved by the voters of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek at a local election held in each city to control the conduct of gaming in that jurisdiction.

"Operator" means any person who places slot machines upon the person's business premises or any person who, individually or jointly, pursuant to an agreement whereby consideration is paid for the right to place slot machines on another's business premises, engages in the business of placing and operating slot machines on retail premises within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, business trust, government or governmental subdivision or agency, estate, association, trust, for profit corporation, nonprofit corporation, organization, or any other legal entity or a manager, agent, servant, officer, or employee thereof.

"Poker" means a card game played by a player or players who are dealt cards by a dealer. The object of the game is:

For each player to bet the superiority of such player's hand and win the other players' bets by either making a bet no other player is willing to match or proving to hold the most valuable cards after all the betting is over; or

For each player, whether by reason of the skill of the player or application of the element of chance, or both, to hold a poker hand entitled to a monetary or premium return based upon a publicly available pay schedule.

In a variation of poker in which there can be more than one winning hand and the dealer's participation is necessary or desirable to improve the game for players other than the dealer, the dealer may play, but under no circumstances may the dealer place a wager in any game in which he or she is dealing. A game in which the player holding the highest-scoring hand splits his or her winnings with the player holding the lowest-scoring hand does not qualify as a "variation of poker in which there can be more than one winning hand" for purposes of this subsection (25)(b).

"Repeating gambling offender" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 18-10-102 (9).

"Retailer" means any licensee who maintains gaming at his or her place of business within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek for use and operation by the public.

"Retail space" means the area where a retailer's business is principally conducted.

"Roulette" means a game in which a ball is spun on a rotating wheel and drops into a numbered slot on the wheel, and bets are placed on which slot the ball will come to rest in.

"Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical, video, electronic, or other device, contrivance, or machine which, after insertion of a coin, token, or similar object, or upon payment of any required consideration whatsoever by a player, is available to be played or operated, and that, whether by reason of the skill of the player or application of the element of chance, or both, may deliver or entitle the player operating the machine to receive cash premiums, merchandise, tokens, or redeemable game credits, or any other thing of value other than unredeemable free games, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machines or in any other manner.

"Slot machine" does not include:

A vintage slot machine model that:

Was introduced on the market before 1984;

Does not contain component parts manufactured in 1984 or thereafter; and

Is not used for gambling purposes or in connection with limited gaming; or

Crane games.

"Slot machine distributor" means any person who imports into this state, or first receives in this state, slot machines, or who sells, leases, for a fixed or flat fee, or distributes slot machines in this state; except that "slot machine distributor" does not include operators licensed in this state.

"Slot machine manufacturer" means any person who designs, assembles, fabricates, produces, constructs, or otherwise prepares a complete or component part of a slot machine, other than tables or cabinetry; except that "slot machine manufacturer" does not include licensed operators performing incidental repairs on their own slot machines or slot machines leased or distributed by them. A licensed slot machine manufacturer may sell slot machines, or components of slot machines, of its own manufacture to licensed slot machine distributors or operators. A licensed manufacturer may also import those slot machine parts or components necessary for its manufacturing operations.

(32.5) "Sports betting" means placing one or more bets in a sports betting operation, as defined in section 44-30-1501 (10).

"Suitability" or "suitable" means, in relation to a person, the ability to be licensed by the commission and, in relation to acts or practices, lawful acts or practices.

"Unsuitability or unsuitable" means, in relation to a person, the inability to be licensed by the commission because of prior acts, associations, or financial conditions, and, in relation to acts or practices, those that violate or would violate the statutes or rules or are or would be contrary to the declared legislative purposes of this article 30.

"Within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek" means within the commercial district of any of those cities as specified in section 44-30-105.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 169, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(5) and (17) amended and (32.5) added, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3210, § 2, effective May 1, 2020.

Initiated 2020:

(22) amended, Amendment 77, effective May 1, 2021. See L. 2021, p. 4210.

L. 2021:

(6) amended, (HB 21-1296), ch. 386, p. 2585, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

IP(14) amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2875, § 4, effective August 10.

44-30-104. Limited gaming - sports betting - authorization - regulation.

Limited gaming and sports betting are hereby authorized and may be operated and maintained subject to this article 30. All limited gaming and sports betting authorized by this article 30 is subject to regulation by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 174, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1327), ch. 347, p. 3210, § 3, effective May 1, 2020.

44-30-105. Limited gaming - cities - commercial districts.

Limited gaming shall take place only in the following existing Colorado cities: The city of Central, county of Gilpin; the city of Black Hawk, county of Gilpin; and the city of Cripple Creek, county of Teller. Limited gaming shall be further confined to the commercial districts of said cities as said districts are respectively defined in the city ordinances adopted by the city of Central on October 7, 1981; the city of Black Hawk on May 4, 1978; and the city of Cripple Creek on December 3, 1973.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 174, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-105 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-106. Exceptions.

Nothing in this article 30 shall be construed in any way to affect or interfere with the regulation of bingo and raffles by the office of the secretary of state.

Nothing contained in this article 30 shall be construed to modify, amend, or otherwise affect the validity of any provisions contained in article 10 of title 18.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 174, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-106 as it existed prior to 2018.